District of Columbia statutes.
46-216

Termination of employment.

(a)

Within 10 days after an employer receives notice that the obligor will terminate employment or within 10 days after the termination, whichever occurs earlier, the employer shall notify the IV-D agency and provide the obligor’s last known address and the name and address of the obligor’s new employer, if known.

(b)

The IV-D agency shall serve an order to withhold on the obligor’s new employer within 2 business days after receipt of information regarding the obligor’s new place of employment, or within 2 business days after the date information regarding the obligor is entered into the District of Columbia Directory of New Hires pursuant to § 46-226.06, whichever occurs first.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 17, 33 DCR 6710
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-269, § 108(p), 48 DCR 1270
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 3403(m), 51 DCR 8441
May 12, 2006, D.C. Law 16-100, § 3(p), 53 DCR 1886
This section is referenced in § 46-211.
1981 Ed., § 30-516.
D.C. Law 13-269 substituted “Collection and Disbursement Unit” for “Court” in subsec. (a); and rewrote subsec. (b) which had read:
“(b) Within 20 days of receipt of information regarding the obligor’s new place of employment, the Court shall notify the obligor’s new employer, in accordance with the requirements of § 46-211, that the withholding is binding on the new employer.”
D.C. Law 15-205, in subsecs. (a) and (b), substituted “Court” for “Collection and Disbursement Unit”.
D.C. Law 16-100, in subsec. (a), substituted “IV-D agency” for “Court”; and rewrote subsec. (b), which had read as follows: “(b) Within 2 business days after the receipt of information regarding the obligor’s new place of employment or within 2 business days after the date information regarding the obligor is entered into the District of Columbia Directory of New Hires pursuant to § 46-226.06, whichever occurs first, the Court shall notify the obligor’s new employer in accordance with the requirements of § 46-211, that the withholding is binding.”
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 7(o) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-210, April 13, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 3832).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 107(p) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-57, March 7, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 1979).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 107(p) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-207, March 31, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3238).
Section 3(q) of D.C. Law 16-42, in subsec. (a), substituted “IV-D agency” for “Court”; and rewrote subsec. (b) to read as follows:
“(b) The IV-D agency shall serve an order to withhold on the obligor’s new employer within 2 business days after receipt of information regarding the obligor’s new place of employment, or within 2 business days after the date information regarding the obligor is entered into the District of Columbia Directory of New Hires pursuant to section 27f, whichever occurs first.”
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 16-42 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 7(j) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-222, December 23, 1997, 44 DCR 114).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 7(o) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-309, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1923), § 7(o) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-439, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 6110), § 7(o) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-503, October 27, 1998, 45 DCR 8495), and § 7(o) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-600, January 20, 1999, 46 DCR 1239).
For temporary repeal of D.C. Law 12-103, see § 13 of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-439, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 6110).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 107(p) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 107(p) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-177, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9678).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 107(p) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-241, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 581).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 107(p) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-446, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9213).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 108(p) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-5, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2440).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3403(m) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3403(m) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(q) of Income Withholding Transfer and Revision Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-167, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7648).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(q) of Income Withholding Transfer and Revision Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-200, November 17, 2005, 52 DCR 10490).